Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13A Administrative Regulations

13A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrative body” means each state board, bureau, cabinet, commission, department, authority, officer, or other entity, except the General Assembly and the Court of Justice, authorized by law to promulgate administrative regulations;

“Administrative regulation” means each statement of general applicability promulgated by an administrative body that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or practice requirements of any administrative body. The term includes an existing administrative regulation, a new administrative regulation, an emergency administrative regulation, an administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute, and the amendment or repeal of an existing administrative regulation, but does not include:

Statements concerning only the internal management of an administrative body and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public;

Declaratory rulings;

Intradepartmental memoranda not in conflict with KRS

13A.130

;

Statements relating to acquisition of property for highway purposes and statements relating to the construction or maintenance of highways; or

Rules, regulations, and policies of the governing boards of institutions that make up the postsecondary education system defined in KRS

164.001

pertaining to students attending or applicants to the institutions, to faculty and staff of the respective institutions, or to the control and maintenance of land and buildings occupied by the respective institutions;

“Adopted” means that an administrative regulation has become effective in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

“Authorizing signature” means the signature of the head of the administrative body authorized by statute to promulgate administrative regulations;

“Commission” means the Legislative Research Commission;

“Effective” means an administrative regulation that has completed the legislative committee review established by KRS

13A.290

,

13A.330

, and

13A.331

;

“Federal mandate” means any federal constitutional, legislative, or executive law or order that requires or permits any administrative body to engage in regulatory activities that impose compliance standards, reporting requirements, recordkeeping, or similar responsibilities upon entities in the Commonwealth;

“Federal mandate comparison” means a written statement containing the information required by KRS

13A.245

;

“Filed” or “promulgated” means that an administrative regulation, or other document required to be filed by this chapter, has been submitted to the Commission in accordance with this chapter;

“Last effective date” means the latter of:

The most recent date an ordinary administrative regulation became effective, without including the date a technical amendment was made pursuant to KRS 13A.040(10), 13A.2255(2), or

13A.312

; or

The date a certification letter was filed with the regulations compiler for that administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.3104(4), if the letter stated that the administrative regulation shall remain in effect without amendment;

“Legislative committee” means an interim joint committee, a House or Senate standing committee, a statutory committee, or a subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission;

“Local government” means and includes a city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, special district, or a quasi-governmental body authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or a local ordinance;

“Major economic impact” means an overall negative or adverse economic impact from an administrative regulation of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more on state or local government or regulated entities, in aggregate, as determined by the promulgating administrative bodies;

“Proposed administrative regulation” means an administrative regulation that:

Has been filed by an administrative body; and

Has not become effective or been withdrawn;

“Regulatory impact analysis” means a written statement containing the provisions required by KRS

13A.240

;

“Small business” means a business entity, including its affiliates, that:

Is independently owned and operated; and

Employs fewer than one hundred fifty (150) full-time employees or their equivalent; or

Has gross annual sales of less than six million dollars ($6,000,000);

“Statement of consideration” means the document required by KRS

13A.280

in which the administrative body summarizes the comments received, its responses to those comments, and the action taken, if any, as a result of those comments and responses;

“Subcommittee” means the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission;

“Tiering” means the tailoring of regulatory requirements to fit the particular circumstances surrounding regulated entities; and

“Written comments” means comments submitted to the administrative body’s contact person identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d) via hand delivery, United States mail, e-mail, or facsimile and may include but is not limited to comments submitted internally from within the promulgating administrative body or from another administrative body.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 1, effective April 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 89, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 516, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 30, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 38, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 288, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 406, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 100, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 1, effective February 2, 2021; 2022 ch. 207, § 1, effective April 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 207, sec. 1. Under Section 5 of that Act, the Act shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky REINS Act, or the Kentucky Regulations from the Executive in Need of Scrutiny Act.

13A.012.
Inclusion of osteopaths within references to physicians in administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

13A.015.
Notice of intent to promulgate an administrative regulation — Public hearing. [Repealed.]

13A.016.
KRS 13A.015 inapplicable to administrative regulation promulgated only for drafting or format requirements. [Repealed.]

13A.017.
Consideration of comments from public hearing — Post-hearing filings or notification. [Repealed.]

13A.020.
Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee — Membership — Meetings — Vote required to act.

There is hereby created a permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known as the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee. The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President; one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of Representatives. The members of the subcommittee shall serve for terms of two (2) years, and the members appointed from each chamber shall elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair. Any vacancy that may occur in the membership of the subcommittee shall be filled by the same appointing authority who made the original appointment.

On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be rescheduled by agreement of both co-chairs. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for subcommittee meeting agendas and presiding at subcommittee meetings. The members of the subcommittee shall be compensated for attending meetings, as provided in KRS 7.090(3).

Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090(4) and (5).

A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 2, effective April 13, 1984; 2003, ch. 185, § 3, effective March 31, 2003; 2016 ch. 82, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.030.
Duties of subcommittee.

The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall:

Conduct a continuous study as to whether additional legislation or changes in legislation are needed based on various factors, including, but not limited to, review of new, emergency, and existing administrative regulations, the lack of administrative regulations, and the needs of administrative bodies;

Except as provided by KRS

158.6471

and

158.6472

, review and comment upon effective administrative regulations pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section or administrative regulations filed with the Commission;

Make recommendations for changes in statutes, new statutes, repeal of statutes affecting administrative regulations or the ability of administrative bodies to promulgate them; and

Conduct such other studies relating to administrative regulations as may be assigned by the Commission.

The subcommittee may make a determination:

That an effective administrative regulation or an administrative regulation filed with the Commission is deficient because it:

Is wrongfully promulgated;

Appears to be in conflict with an existing statute;

Appears to have no statutory authority for its promulgation;

Appears to impose stricter or more burdensome state requirements than required by the federal mandate, without reasonable justification;

Fails to use tiering when tiering is applicable;

Is in excess of the administrative body’s authority;

Appears to impose an unreasonable burden on government or small business, or both;

Is filed as an emergency administrative regulation without adequate justification of the emergency nature of the situation as described in KRS 13A.190(1);

Has not been noticed in conformance with the requirements of KRS 13A.270(3);

Does not provide an adequate cost analysis pursuant to KRS

13A.250

; or

Appears to be deficient in any other manner;

That an administrative regulation is needed to implement an existing statute; or

That an administrative regulation should be amended or repealed.

The subcommittee may review an effective administrative regulation if requested by a member of the subcommittee.

The subcommittee may require any administrative body to submit data and information as required by the subcommittee in the performance of its duties under this chapter, and no administrative body shall fail to provide the information or data required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 3, effective April 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 89, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 410, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 598, § 7, effective April 14, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 165, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2021 ch. 7, § 2, effective February 2, 2021; 2022 ch. 207, § 4, effective April 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 207, sec. 4. Under Section 5 of that Act, the Act shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky REINS Act, or the Kentucky Regulations from the Executive in Need of Scrutiny Act.

13A.032.
Effect of finding of deficiency. [Repealed.]

13A.040.
Administrative regulations compiler — Duties.

The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall appoint an administrative regulations compiler who shall:

Receive administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by the provisions of this chapter, tendered for filing;

Stamp administrative regulations tendered for filing with the time and date of receipt;

Provide administrative and support services to the subcommittee;

Maintain a file of administrative regulations and other documents required to be filed by this chapter, for public inspection, with suitable indexes;

Maintain a file of ineffective administrative regulations;

Maintain a file of material incorporated by reference, including superseded or ineffective material incorporated by reference;

Prepare the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;

Upon request, certify copies of administrative regulations and other documents that have been filed with the regulations compiler;

Correct errors that do not change the substance of an administrative regulation including but not limited to typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;

Change the following items in an administrative regulation in response to a specific written request for a technical amendment submitted by the administrative body if the regulations compiler determines that the requested changes do not affect the substance of the administrative regulation:

The administrative body’s identifying information, including address, phone number, fax number, Web site address, and e-mail address;

Typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;

Citations to statutes or other administrative regulations if a format change within that statute or administrative regulation has changed the numbering or lettering of parts; or

Other changes in accordance with KRS

13A.312

; and

Notify the administrative body within thirty (30) business days of receipt of a technical amendment letter the status of the request, including:

Any requested changes that are accepted as technical amendments; and

Any requested changes that are not accepted as technical amendments;

Refuse to accept for filing administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by this chapter, that do not conform to the drafting, formatting, or filing requirements established by the provisions of KRS 13A.190(5) to (11),

13A.220

, 13A.222(1), (2), and (3),

13A.230

, and

13A.280

, and notify the administrative body in writing of the reasons for refusing to accept an administrative regulation for filing;

Maintain a list of all administrative regulation numbers and the corresponding last effective date, based on the information included in the history line of each administrative regulation; and

Perform other duties required by the Commission or by a legislative committee.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 4, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 425, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 77, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 77, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 192, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 3, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 125, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 7 and 125, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

13A.050.
Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service — “Administrative Register of Kentucky” — Publication dates — Certificate of compiler — Fees.

The Legislative Research Commission shall compile, publish, and distribute the administrative regulations filed by administrative bodies. This compilation shall be known as the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service. The Legislative Research Commission shall maintain the official version of the administrative regulations in an electronic database that shall be made available to the public as provided by KRS

7.500

.

There is hereby created a publication known as “Administrative Register of Kentucky” or “Administrative Register” to be published on a monthly basis by the Legislative Research Commission for the purpose of giving notice of administrative regulations filed in accordance with this chapter.

Every administrative regulation forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission shall have its complete text published in the Administrative Register along with the accompanying statements required by KRS

13A.190

,

13A.210

, 13A.2251(1),

13A.240

,

13A.245

,

13A.250

, and

13A.270

.

Within five (5) workdays of the publication of an administrative regulation in the Administrative Register, an administrative body shall:

Review the text and accompanying statements of the administrative regulation; and

Notify the regulations compiler in writing or by e-mail of errors.

The Administrative Register shall be published the first day of each month and shall include all administrative regulations received by the Legislative Research Commission by 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the preceding month. When the fifteenth day falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the deadline is the workday that immediately precedes the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.

The compiler shall cause to be prepared a certificate to the effect that the text of the administrative regulations as published in this service is correct. One (1) copy of the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service with the original certificate therein shall be provided to the Office of the Secretary of State.

The Commission shall prescribe reasonable fees for subscription to the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service and the Administrative Register. All fees paid to the Commission for these publications shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving trust or agency fund account, for use by the Legislative Research Commission in carrying out the provisions of this section.

Copies of administrative regulations or other items required to be filed by this chapter shall be made available to any interested party upon request to the Legislative Research Commission. The Commission may prescribe reasonable fees for duplication services and all fees paid to the Commission for duplication services shall be placed in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving trust or agency fund account, for use by the Legislative Research Commission in carrying out the provisions of this subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 5, effective April 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 410, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 89, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 3, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.060.
Exclusive publication by Legislative Research Commission — Copies available to members of General Assembly.

No administrative body other than the Legislative Research Commission shall publish administrative regulations unless permission is granted by the Legislative Research Commission and the administrative regulations are enclosed in a booklet or binder on which the words “informational copy” are clearly stamped or printed.

Copies of the Administrative Register and the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service shall be provided to a member of the General Assembly only upon the request of the member.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 6, effective April 13, 1984.

13A.070.
Administrative regulations promulgated by Commission — Assistance to administrative bodies.

The Commission may promulgate administrative regulations governing the manner and form in which administrative regulations shall be prepared, to the end that all administrative regulations shall be prepared in a uniform manner.

The Commission shall furnish advice and assistance to all administrative bodies in the preparation of their administrative regulations, and in revising, codifying, and editing existing or new administrative regulations.

An administrative regulation promulgated by the Commission shall be signed by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 7, effective April 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 406, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2016 ch. 82, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.075.
Legislative Research Commission may promulgate regulations. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; repealed by 2016 ch. 82, § 36, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.080.
Inclusion in Administrative Register of notice of review process and procedures for public comment. [Repealed.]

13A.090.
Rebuttable presumption of correctness of content of administrative regulations — Judicial notice.

The Commission’s authenticated file stamp upon an administrative regulation or publication of an administrative regulation in the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service or other publication shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the contents of the administrative regulation are correct.

The courts shall take judicial notice of any administrative regulation duly filed under the provisions of this chapter after the administrative regulation has been adopted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 9, effective April 13, 1984.

13A.100.
Matters which shall be prescribed by administrative regulation.

Subject to limitations in applicable statutes, any administrative body that is empowered to promulgate administrative regulations shall, by administrative regulation, prescribe, consistent with applicable statutes:

Each statement of general applicability, policy, procedure, memorandum, or other form of action that implements; interprets; prescribes law or policy; describes the organization, procedure, or practice requirements of any administrative body; or affects private rights or procedures available to the public;

The process for application for license, benefits available or other matters for which an application would be appropriate unless such process is prescribed by a statute;

Fees, except for those exempted in paragraphs (a) to (j) of this subsection, to be charged by the administrative body if such fees are authorized by law and are not set by statute:

State park room rates;

Prices for food in restaurants at state facilities;

Prices for goods at gift shops at state facilities;

Prices for groceries and other items sold at state facilities;

Prices charged for state publications;

Prices charged for rides and amusement activities at state facilities;

Admission fees to athletic and entertainment events at state facilities;

Charges for swimming, skiing, horseback riding, and similar recreational activities at state facilities;

Charges for boat and equipment rentals for recreational purposes at state facilities; and

Admission fees charged for seminars and educational courses by state administrative bodies;

The procedures to be utilized by the administrative body in the conduct of hearings by or for the administrative body unless such procedures are prescribed by a statute; and

The disciplinary procedures within the jurisdiction of the administrative body unless such procedures are prescribed by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 10, effective April 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 516, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 82, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Acts 1984, ch. 419, effective July 13, 1984, provides:

“Section 1.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the amendment of Section 10 by the Free Conference Committee report to 1984 HB 334 applies only to fees which are governmental in nature charged by state agencies and not to fees and charges which are proprietary in nature.

Section 2.
This resolution may be used by a court as an aid in the construction of 1984 HB 334.”

13A.110.
Prescription of forms and tables.

Except as provided in KRS

131.131

, and subject to limitations in applicable statutes, any administrative body that is empowered to promulgate administrative regulations may, consistent with applicable statutes, prescribe forms and tables for use by the administrative body and for the public in dealing with the administrative body unless the content of such form is prescribed by a statute. Forms that are required to be submitted by a regulated entity shall be included in an administrative regulation. Forms and tables that meet the requirements of KRS

13A.2245

may be incorporated by reference.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 11, effective April 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 516, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 2016 ch. 82, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.120.
Promulgation of administrative regulations — Prohibitions concerning promulgations.

An administrative body may promulgate administrative regulations to implement a statute only when the act of the General Assembly creating or amending the statute specifically authorizes the promulgation of administrative regulations or administrative regulations are required by federal law, in which case administrative regulations shall be no more stringent than the federal law or regulations.

An administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation required by federal law or federal regulation shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

An administrative body shall not promulgate administrative regulations:

When a statute prohibits the administrative body from promulgating administrative regulations;

When the administrative body is not authorized by statute to promulgate administrative regulations;

When a statute prohibits the administrative body from regulation of that particular matter;

When the administrative body is not authorized by statute to regulate that particular matter;

When a statute prescribes the same or similar procedure for the matter regulated;

When a statute sets forth a comprehensive scheme of regulation of the particular matter;

On any matter that is not clearly within the jurisdiction of the administrative body;

On any matter that is beyond the statutory authorization of the administrative body to promulgate administrative regulations or that is not clearly authorized by statute; and

That modify or vitiate a statute or its intent.

If a statute requires an administrative body or official to submit an administrative regulation to an official or administrative body for review or approval prior to filing the administrative regulation with the commission, the administrative body or official shall not file the administrative regulation without first having obtained the review or approval.

Any administrative regulation in violation of this section or the spirit thereof is null, void, and unenforceable.

No administrative body, other than the Court of Justice, shall issue rules.

No administrative body shall issue standards or by any other name issue a document of any type where an administrative regulation is required or authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 12, effective April 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 499, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 516, § 18, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2016 ch. 82, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.125.
Restrictions on filing subsequent proposed administrative regulation with same number and title.

Prior to the effective date of a proposed administrative regulation, an administrative body shall not file a subsequent proposed administrative regulation with the same number or title unless:

The proposed administrative regulation already filed is withdrawn in accordance with KRS

13A.310

; and

A subsequent proposed administrative regulation is filed in accordance with KRS

13A.220

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 89, § 7, effective June 24, 2003; 2016 ch. 82, § 9, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.130.
Matters prohibited as subject of internal policy, memorandum, or other form of action.

An administrative body shall not by internal policy, memorandum, or other form of action:

Modify a statute or administrative regulation;

Expand upon or limit a statute or administrative regulation; or

Except as authorized by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Kentucky, or a statute, expand or limit a right guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Kentucky, a statute, or an administrative regulation.

Any administrative body memorandum, internal policy, or other form of action violative of this section or the spirit thereof is null, void, and unenforceable.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit an administrative body issuing an opinion or administrative decision that is authorized by statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 13, effective April 13, 1984; 2016 ch. 82, § 10, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.140.
Administrative regulations presumed valid — Promulgating administrative body to bear burden of proof in court challenge. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 14, effective April 13, 1984; repealed by 2016 ch. 82, § 36, effective July 15, 2016.

13A.150.
Specified time for filing.

When any section of this chapter requires that an action be taken at a specified date with regard to filing of items to the Commission and the section does not specify a time deadline, they shall be filed on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the specified date.

When any section of this chapter requires that an action be taken at a specified date and the specified date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the action shall be taken on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the working day immediately preceding the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday unless the statute specifies a different deadline.

When any section of this chapter requires that a meeting be held on or before a specified date and the specified date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the meeting shall be held on or before close of business on the working day immediately following the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 15, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 425, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 100, § 4, effective June 20, 2005.

13A.160.
Notice of hearing to compiler when hearing is required before filing of administrative regulations — Publication. [Repealed.]

13A.170.
Methods of promulgating administrative regulations.

Three (3) methods of promulgating administrative regulations are authorized:

An ordinary administrative regulation;

An emergency administrative regulation; and

An administrative regulation in contemplation of a statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 17, effective April 13, 1984.

13A.180.
Ordinary administrative regulation defined.

An ordinary administrative regulation is one that is promulgated in the normal manner by an administrative body and that does not require that it be placed in effect immediately.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 18, effective April 13, 1984; 2016 ch. 82, § 11, effective July 15, 2016.